Utah statutes.
23-22-3.   Reciprocal agreements with other states.

(1)  The Wildlife Board is authorized to enter into reciprocal agreements with other states  to:

(a)  license and regulate fishing, hunting, and related activities; and

(b)  promote and implement wildlife management programs.

(2)  Reciprocal agreements must be approved by the executive director of the Department of Natural Resources.

